Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM

Note

Survey to identify potential historic districts and
single-family residences for listing on Hawaii register of historic places;
report to 2018 legislature. L 2015, c 89, §1.

[§6E-1] Declaration of intent. The
Constitution of the State of Hawaii recognizes the value of conserving and
developing the historic and cultural property within the State for the public
good. The legislature declares that the historic and cultural heritage of the
State is among its important assets and that the rapid social and economic
developments of contemporary society threaten to destroy the remaining vestiges
of this heritage. The legislature further declares that it is in the public
interest to engage in a comprehensive program of historic preservation at all
levels of government to promote the use and conservation of such property for
the education, inspiration, pleasure, and enrichment of its citizens. The
legislature further declares that it shall be the public policy of this State
to provide leadership in preserving, restoring, and maintaining historic and
cultural property, to ensure the administration of such historic and cultural
property in a spirit of stewardship and trusteeship for future generations, and
to conduct activities, plans, and programs in a manner consistent with the
preservation and enhancement of historic and cultural property. [L 1976, c 104,
pt of §2]

Cross References

Foundation on culture and the arts, see chapter 9.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next